District of Columbia statutes.
19-1516

Application to existing relationships.

Except as otherwise provided in § 19-1513, an interest in or power over property existing on the effective date of this chapter as to which the time for delivering or filing a disclaimer under law superseded by this chapter has not expired may be disclaimed after the effective date of this chapter.

History

Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-205, § 2(b), 53 DCR 9063

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 16 of the Uniform Disclaimer of Property Interests Act (1999).